extras/dictionaries/la.aff
SFX B or      nda             eor       
SFX B or      ndaque          eor       
SFX B or      ndane           eor       
SFX B or      ndave           eor       
SFX B or      ndam            eor       
SFX B or      ndamque         eor       
SFX B or      ndamne          eor       
SFX B or      ndamve          eor       
SFX B or      ndae            eor       
SFX B or      ndaeque         eor       
SFX B or      ndaene          eor       
SFX B or      ndaeve          eor       
SFX B or      ndæ             eor       
SFX B or      ndæque          eor       
SFX B or      ndæne           eor       
SFX B or      ndæve           eor       
SFX B or      ndos            eor       
SFX B or      ndosque         eor       
SFX B or      ndosne          eor       
SFX B or      ndosve          eor       
SFX B or      ndorum          eor       
SFX B or      ndorumque       eor       
SFX B or      ndorumne        eor       
SFX B or      ndorumve        eor       
SFX B or      ndis            eor       
SFX B or      ndisque         eor       
SFX B or      ndisne          eor       
SFX B or      ndisve          eor       
SFX B or      ndas            eor       
SFX B or      ndasque         eor       
SFX B or      ndasne          eor       
SFX B or      ndasve          eor       
SFX B or      ndarum          eor       
SFX B or      ndarumque       eor       
SFX B or      ndarumne        eor       
SFX B or      ndarumve        eor       
SFX B o       o               io        
SFX B o       oque            io        
SFX B o       one             io        
SFX B o       ove             io        
SFX B o       s               io        
SFX B o       sque            io        
SFX B o       sne             io        
SFX B o       sve             io        
SFX B o       t               io        
SFX B o       tque            io        
SFX B o       tne             io        
SFX B o       tve             io        
SFX B o       mus             io        
SFX B o       musque          io        
SFX B o       musne           io        
SFX B o       musve           io        
SFX B o       tis             io        
SFX B o       tisque          io        
SFX B o       tisne           io        
SFX B o       tisve           io        
SFX B o       unt             io        
SFX B o       untque          io        
SFX B o       untne           io        
SFX B o       untve           io        
SFX B o       ebam            io        
SFX B o       ebamque         io        
SFX B o       ebamne          io        
SFX B o       ebamve          io        
SFX B o       ebas            io        
SFX B o       ebasque         io        
SFX B o       ebasne          io        
SFX B o       ebasve          io        
SFX B o       ebat            io        
SFX B o       ebatque         io        
SFX B o       ebatne          io        
SFX B o       ebatve          io        
SFX B o       ebamus          io        
SFX B o       ebamusque       io        
SFX B o       ebamusne        io        
SFX B o       ebamusve        io        
SFX B o       ebatis          io        
SFX B o       ebatisque       io        
SFX B o       ebatisne        io        
SFX B o       ebatisve        io        
SFX B o       ebant           io        
SFX B o       ebantque        io        
SFX B o       ebantne         io        
SFX B o       ebantve         io        
SFX B o       am              io        
SFX B o       amque           io        
SFX B o       amne            io        
SFX B o       amve            io        
SFX B o       es              io        
SFX B o       esque           io        
SFX B o       esne            io        
SFX B o       esve            io        
SFX B o       et              io        
SFX B o       etque           io        
SFX B o       etne            io        
SFX B o       etve            io        
SFX B o       emus            io        
SFX B o       emusque         io        
SFX B o       emusne          io        
SFX B o       emusve          io        
SFX B o       etis            io        
SFX B o       etisque         io        
SFX B o       etisne          io        
SFX B o       etisve          io        
SFX B o       ent             io        
SFX B o       entque          io        
SFX B o       entne           io        
SFX B o       entve           io        
SFX B o       as              io        
SFX B o       asque           io        
SFX B o       asne            io        
SFX B o       asve            io        
SFX B o       at              io        
SFX B o       atque           io        
SFX B o       atne            io        
SFX B o       atve            io        
SFX B o       amus            io        
SFX B o       amusque         io        
SFX B o       amusne          io        
SFX B o       amusve          io        
SFX B o       atis            io        
SFX B o       atisque         io        
SFX B o       atisne          io        
SFX B o       atisve          io        
SFX B o       ant             io        
SFX B o       antque          io        
SFX B o       antne           io        
SFX B o       antve           io        
SFX B io      erem            io        
SFX B io      eremque         io        
SFX B io      eremne          io        
SFX B io      eremve          io        
SFX B io      eres            io        
SFX B io      eresque         io        
SFX B io      eresne          io        
SFX B io      eresve          io        
SFX B io      eret            io        
SFX B io      eretque         io        
SFX B io      eretne          io        
SFX B io      eretve          io        
SFX B io      eremus          io        
SFX B io      eremusque       io        
SFX B io      eremusne        io        
SFX B io      eremusve        io        
SFX B io      eretis          io        
SFX B io      eretisque       io        
SFX B io      eretisne        io        
SFX B io      eretisve        io        
SFX B io      erent           io        
SFX B io      erentque        io        
SFX B io      erentne         io        
SFX B io      erentve         io        
SFX B io      e               io        
SFX B io      eque            io        
SFX B io      ene             io        
SFX B io      eve             io        
SFX B io      ite             io        
SFX B io      iteque          io        
SFX B io      itene           io        
SFX B io      iteve           io        
SFX B io      ito             io        
SFX B io      itoque          io        
SFX B io      itone           io        
SFX B io      itove           io        
SFX B io      itote           io        
SFX B io      itoteque        io        
SFX B io      itotene         io        
SFX B io      itoteve         io        
SFX B io      iunto           io        
SFX B io      iuntoque        io        
SFX B io      iuntone         io        
SFX B io      iuntove         io        
SFX B io      ere             io        
SFX B io      ereque          io        
SFX B io      erene           io        
SFX B io      ereve           io        
SFX B o       endum           io        
SFX B o       endumque        io        
SFX B o       endumne         io        
SFX B o       endumve         io        
SFX B o       endi            io        
SFX B o       endique         io        
SFX B o       endine          io        
SFX B o       endive          io        
SFX B o       endo            io        
SFX B o       endoque         io        
SFX B o       endone          io        
SFX B o       endove          io        
SFX B o       undum           io        
SFX B o       undumque        io        
SFX B o       undumne         io        
SFX B o       undumve         io        
SFX B o       undi            io        
SFX B o       undique         io        
SFX B o       undine          io        
