extras/dictionaries/la.dic
aberceo/B
abludo/B
abrado/B
absoleo/B
abstulo/B
accio/B
accresco/B
adagnosco/B
adcurro/B
adedo/B
adfodio/B
adgnosco/B
adicio/B
adinquiro/B
adlido/B
admitto/B
adobruo/B
adpeto/B
adpromitto/B
adrodo/B
adsenseo/B
adstituo/B
adsuesco/B
adtineo/B
adtribuo/B
adverro/B
aequependeo/B
affluo/B
aggero/B
albicasco/B
allego/B
alloquor/B
amaresco/B
ammoveo/B
ango/B
antecello/B
anteverto/B
apparesco/B
applaudo/B
apstineo/B
aresco/B
arruo/B
aspuo/B
assoleo/B
assurgo/B
attero/B
attorreo/B
aufugio/B
aveo/B
benefacio/B
brutisco/B
calesco/B
candefacio/B
capillasco/B
carpo/B
certisco/B
circumamplector/B
circumdoleo/B
circumfundo/B
circumlego/B
circumobruo/B
circumscindo/B
circumspergo/B
circumtero/B
circumvado/B
claudeo/B
coaddo/B
coerceo/B
coibeo/B
collabor/B
colliquesco/B
coluo/B
commaturesco/B
committo/B
compaciscor/B
comperco/B
complector/B
comprimo/B
concaleo/B
concingo/B
concrucifigo/B
condepso/B
condormisco/B
confindo/B
confremo/B
congemisco/B
coniicio/B
conligo/B
conlugeo/B
conmeio/B
conmitto/B
connecto/B
conpavesco/B
conpinguesco/B
conpraecido/B
conqueror/B
conrigo/B
conscribo/B
consolvo/B
constrepo/B
consueo/B
contego/B
conticeo/B
contrado/B
contremisco/B
conveho/B
conviso/B
coorior/BC
corrideo/B
crebresco/B
cumbo/B
debibo/B
decipio/B
dedeceo/B
defervesco/B
defloreo/B
defugio/B
deguno/B
deleo/B
delitisco/B
demo/B
depaciscor/B
deperco/B
deposco/B
depungo/B
derigo/B
desenesco/B
desolvo/B
destituo/B
desurgo/B
deticesco/B
detundo/B
devescor/B
diffido/B
digero/B
diluceo/B
dirapio/B
discaveo/B
disconduco/B
dishiasco/B
dispello/B
displodo/B
dissero/B
distabesco/B
distraho/B
divorto/B
duresco/B
ecfleo/B
ecfrondesco/B
edissero/B
effervesco/B
effluesco/B
effutio/B
elabor/B
elingo/B
emacresco/B
emitto/B
emungo/B
eremigo/ABS
escendo/B
everro/B
exabutor/B
exaresco/B
excandisco/B
excipio/B
excutio/B
exfringo/B
exigo/B
expallesco/B
expergisco/B
explendesco/B
expungo/B
exsculpo/B
exspargo/B
exsurgo/B
extorceo/B
extumesco/B
exveho/B
fateor/B
ferbeo/B
fidepromitto/B
flaccisco/B
fluesco/B
fracesco/B
frigo/B
fulgesco/B
gelasco/B
gigno/B
gradior/B
hebesco/B
horresco/B
ignavesco/B
illicio/B
imbibo/B
immisceo/B
impello/B
impliciscor/B
inacisco/B
inbito/B
incendefacio/B
incipisso/B
incudo/B
indigeo/B
induco/B
inficio/B
infodio/B
ingemisco/B
ingredior/B
inigo/B
inliquor/B
inminuo/B
innecto/B
inpendeo/B
inpliciscor/B
inrado/B
inscendo/B
insideo/B
inspuo/B
insumo/B
intepesco/B
intercludo/B
interfugio/B
interiungo/B
interluo/B
intero/B
interscindo/B
interstringo/B
intervireo/B
intraho/B
introrepo/B
intuor/B
inveho/B
involvo/B
irrubesco/B
iuveo/B
lacteo/B
languesco/B
lego/B
linquo/B
locor/B
ludo/B
madefacio/B
maneo/B
maturefacio/B
meto/B
misereor/B
molo/B
muceo/B
nasco/B
nigreo/B
nitor/B
nubo/B
obcedo/B
obcurro/B
obfendo/B
obhaeresco/B
oblino/B
obmutesco/B
obrepo/B
obsequor/B
obsterno/B
obstupeo/B
obtero/B
obtraho/B
occano/B
occresco/B
offlecto/B
ommoveo/B
oppleo/B
optundo/B
paeniteo/B
pareo/B
patior/B
pellicio/B
perago/B
percandefacio/B
percognosco/B
perdeleo/B
perdoleo/B
perfigo/B
perfrigesco/B
pergnosco/B
perindigeo/B
perlubeo/B
permaturesco/B
perniteo/B
perpello/B
perprurisco/B
perscribo/B
persisto/B
perstringo/B
pertego/B
pertineo/B
perurgeo/B
pervigeo/B
petisso/B
pinguefacio/B
plaudeo/B
porricio/B
praecedo/B
praecutio/B
praefringo/B
praelavo/ABS
praenascor/B
praeripio/B
praestupesco/B
praeterlambo/B
praevaleo/B
procello/B
profiteor/B
proloquor/B
propatior/B
proserpo/B
proviso/B
purpurasco/B
radicesco/B
recedo/B
recompingo/B
redaccendo/B
reficio/B
regero/B
relinquo/B
removeo/B
repatesco/B
reprimo/B
resideo/B
restituo/B
retollo/B
retrudo/B
revireo/B
rubefacio/B
satago/B
secedo/B
seresco/B
sorbeo/B
spondeo/B
struo/B
subdistinguo/B
subgredior/B
sublino/B
subpateo/B
subruo/B
substringo/B
subterluo/B
subverto/B
suffervefacio/B
superabluo/B
supercresco/B
superfugio/B
superincresco/B
superintendo/B
superado/B
superstruo/B
suppaeniteo/B
supravivo/B
tabeo/B
tenuesco/B
texo/B
tonesco/B
tramitto/B
transfungor/B
transpungo/B
tremefacio/B
turgo/B
utor/B
vendo/B
videor/B
vivo/B
